Utah statutes.
58-47b-301.   Licensure required.

(1)  An individual shall hold a license issued under this chapter in order to engage in the practice of massage therapy, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-47b-304.

(2)  An individual shall have a license in order to:

(a)  represent himself as a massage therapist or massage apprentice;

(b)  represents himself as providing a service that is within the practice of massage therapy or uses the word massage or any other word to describe such services; or

(c)  charges or receives a fee or any consideration for providing a service that is within the practice of massage therapy.



Amended by Chapter 159, 1998 General Session

